en: E225, Calcium Disulphite, Calcium Disulfite, Calcium Pyrosulphite, Calcium Pyrosulfite, Potassium sulfite, Potassium sulphite
xx: E225
bg: E225, Калциев дисулфит, Калциев пиро-сулфит, Сулфит на калий
cs: E225, Siřičitan draselný
da: E225, Calcium Disulphite, Calcium Disulfite, Calcium Pyrosulphite, Calcium Pyrosulfite, Potassium sulfite, Potassium sulphite
de: E225, Kaliumsulfit
el: E225, Θειώδες ασβέστιο
es: E225, disulfito cálcico, disulfito de calcio
et: E225, Kaltsiumdisulfit, Kaaliumsulfit
fi: E225, Kalsiumdisulfiitti, Kalsiumdisulfiittia, Kaliumsulfiitti
fr: E225, Disulfite de calcium, Pyrosulfite de calcium, Sulfite de potassium
hu: E225, Kalcium-diszulfit, Kálium-szulfit
it: E225, Disolfito di calcio, Pirosolfito di calcio, Solfuro di potassio
lt: E225, Kalcio disulfitas, Kalcio pirosulfitas, Kalio sulfitas
lv: E225, kalcija disulfīts, Kalcija pirosulfīts
mt: E225, Disulfitt tal-kalċju, Pirosulfitt tal-kalċju, Sulfitt tal-potassju
nl: E225, Kaliumsulfiet
pl: E225, Siarczyn potasu, Disiarczek wapnia, Pirosiarczek wapnia, Siarczek potasu
pt: E225, Dissulfito de cálcio, Pirossulfito de cálcio, Sulfito de potássio
ro: E225, Disulfit de calciu, Pirosulfit de calciu
sk: E225, Siřičitan draselný
sl: E225, Kalcijev disulfit, Kalcijev pirosulfit
sv: E225, Kalciumdisulfit, Kaliumsulfit

en: E226, Calcium sulphite, Calcium sulfite
xx: E226
bg: E226, Калциев сулфит
ca: E226, Sulfit de calci
cs: E226, Siřičitan vápenatý, CaSO3, E 226
da: E226, Calciumsulfit
de: E226, Calciumsulfit, CaSO3, E 226
el: E226, Θειωδες ασβεστιο
es: E226, Sulfito cálcico, Sulfito de calcio, E 226
et: E226, Kaltsiumsulfit
fi: E226, Kalsiumsulfiitti, Kalsiumsulfiittia
fr: E226, Sulfite de calcium
hu: E226, Kalcium-szulfit
it: E226, Solfito di calcio
lt: E226, Kalcio sulfitas
lv: E226, Kalcija sulfīts
mt: E226, Sulfit tal-kalċju
nl: E226, Calciumsulfiet
pl: E226, Siarczyn wapnia
pt: E226, Sulfito de cálcio
ro: E226, Sulfit de calciu
sk: E226, Siričitan vápenatý, Siřičitan vápenatý
sl: E226, Kalcijev sulfit
sv: E226, Kalciumsulfit, E 226, E 285, E 261

en: E227, Calcium bisulphite, Calcium bisulfite
xx: E227
bg: E227, Калциев бисулфит, Калциев бисулфит
ca: E227, sulfit àcid de calci, bisulfit de calci
cs: E227, Hydrogensiřičitan vápenatý, Hydrogensiřičitan vápenatý
da: E227, Calciumhydrogensulfit, Calciumbisulfit
de: E227, Calciumhydrogensulfit, Calciumbisulfit, E 227
el: E227, Οξινο θειωδες ασβεστιο
es: E227, Sulfito ácido de calcio, Bisulfito de calcio, E 227, Bisulfito cálcico
et: E227, Kaltsiumvesiniksulfit
fi: E227, Kalsiumvetysulfiitti, Kalsiumvetysulfiittia
fr: E227, Sulfite acide de calcium, Bisulfite de calcium
hu: E227, Kalcium-hidrogén-szulfit, Kalcium-biszulfit
it: E227, Calcio bisolfito, Bisolfito di calcio
lt: E227, Kalcio bisulfitas, Kalcio bisulfitas
lv: E227, Kalcija bisulfīts, Kalcija bisulfīts
mt: E227, Bisulfit tal-kalċju, Bisulfit tal-kalċju
nl: E227, Calciumwaterstofsulfiet synoniemen, Calciumwaterstofsulfiet, Calciumbisulfiet
pl: E227, Wodorosiarczyn wapnia, Kwaśny siarczyn wapnia, Siarczek wodorowo-wapniowy, Wodorosiarczan(IV) wapnia
pt: E227, Hidrogenossulfito de cálcio, Bissulfito de cálcio
ro: E227, Bisulfit de calciu, Bisulfit de calciu
sk: E227, Hydrogensiričitan vápenatý, Disiričitan vápenatý
sl: E227, Kalcijev bisulfit, kalcijev bisulfit
sv: E227, Kalciumvätesulfit, Kalciumvätesulfit

en: E228, Potassium bisulphite, Potassium bisulfite
xx: E228
bg: E228, Калиев бисулфит, Калиев бисулфит
ca: E228, Sulfit àcid de potassi, bisulfit de potassi
cs: E228, Hydrogensiřičitan draselný, Hydrogensiřičitan draselný, E 228
da: E228, Kaliumhydrogensulfit, Kaliumbisulfit
de: E228, Kaliumhydrogensulfit, Kaliumbisulfit, KHSO3, E 228
el: E228, Οξινο θειωδες καλιο
es: E228, Sulfito ácido de potasio, Bisulfito de potasio, Bisulfito potásico, E 228
et: E228, Kaaliumvesiniksulfit
fi: E228, Kaliumvetysulfiitti, Kaliumbisulfiitti, Kaliumvetysulfiittia, Kaliumbisulfiittia
fr: E228, Sulfite acide de potassium, Bisulfite de potassium, HKSO3
hu: E228, Kálium-hidrogén-szulfit, Kálium-biszulfit
it: E228, Potassio solfito acido, Bisolfito di potassio
lt: E228, Kalio bisulfitas, Kalio bisulfitas
lv: E228, Kālija bisulfīts, Kālija bisulfīts
mt: E228, Bisulfit tal-potassju, Bisulfit tal-potassju
nl: E228, Kaliumwaterstofsulfiet synoniemen, Kaliumwaterstofsulfiet, Kaliumbisulfiet
pl: E228, Wodorosiarczyn potasu, Kwaśny siarczyn potasu, Wodorosiarczan(IV) potasu
pt: E228, Hidrogenossulfito de potássio, Bissulfito de potássio
ro: E228, Bisulfit de potasiu, Bisulfit de potasiu
sk: E228
sl: E228, Kalijev bisulfit, kalijev bisulfit
sv: E228, Kaliumvätesulfit, Kaliumvätesulfit

en: E230, Biphenyl, diphenyl, (C6H5)2
xx: E230
ar: E230, ثنائي الفينيل، ثنائي الفينيل، (C6H5)2
az: E230, Bifenil, difenil, (C6H5)2
bg: E230, Бифенил, дифенил, (C6H5)2
ca: E230, Bifenil
cs: E230, Bifenyl, E 230
da: E230, Biphenyl, diphenyl, (C6H5)2
de: E230, Biphenyl, Dibenzol, Diphenyl, Phenylbenzol, E 230
el: E230, Διφαινύλιο, διφαινύλιο, (C6H5)2
es: E230, Bifenilo, Conservante E 230, Fenilbenceno, Difenilo, E 230, Conservante E230
et: E230, Bifenüül, Fenüülbenseen, Difenüül
fi: E230, Bifenyyli, Fenyylibentseeni, Difenyyli, E 230, Dibentseeni, Bifenyyliä, Fenyylibentseeniä, Difenyyliä, Dibentseeniä
fr: E230, Biphényle, diphényle, 92-52-4
hu: E230, Bifenil, difenil
it: E230, Bifenile, Fenilbenzene, Difenile
ja: E230, ビフェニル、ジフェニル、(C6H5)2
ko: E230, 비페닐, 디페닐, (C6H5)2
lt: E230, Bifenilas, difenilas, (C6H5)2
lv: E230, Bifenils, Difenils, C12h10, Bifenils, difenils, (C6H5)2
nl: E230, Difenyl, Bifenyl
pl: E230, Bifenyl
pt: E230, Bifenilo
ro: E230, Bifenil, difenil, (C6H5)2
ru: E230, Бифенил, дифенил, (C6H5)2
sk: E230, Bifenyl, difenyl, (C6H5)2
sl: E230, Bifenil, difenil, (C6H5)2
sv: E230, Difenyl, Fenylbensen, E 230, Bifenyl
th: E230, ไบฟีนิล, ไดฟีนิล, (C6H5)2
tr: E230, Bifenil, difenil, (C6H5)2
uk: E230, Біфеніл, дифенил, (C6H5)2
zh: E230, 联苯，二苯，(C6H5)2

en: E231, Orthophenyl phenol, 2-hydroxybiphenyl
xx: E231
ar: E231, أورثو فينيل فينول، 2-هيدروكسي ثنائي الفينيل
az: E231, Ortofenil fenol, 2-hidroksibifenil
bg: E231, Ортофенил фенол, 2-хидроксибифенил
ca: E231, Ortofenil fenol, 2-hidroxibifenil
cs: E231, Orthofenylfenol, 2-hydroxybifenyl
da: E231, Orthophenyl phenol, 2-hydroxybiphenyl
de: E231, Orthophenylphenol, 2-Hydroxybiphenyl
el: E231, Ορθοφαινυλο φαινόλη, 2-υδροξυδιφαινύλιο
es: E231, Fenol ortofenil, 2-hidroxibifenilo
et: E231, Ortofenüülfenool, 2-hüdroksübifenüül
fi: E231, Ortofenyylifenoli, Ortofenyylifenolia, Ortofenyyli-fenoli, 2-hydroksibifenyyli
fr: E231, Orthophénylphénol, 2-hydroxybiphényle
hu: E231, Ortofenil-fenol, 2-hidroxi-bifenil
it: E231, Ortofenil fenolo, 2-idrossibifenile
ja: E231, オルトフェニルフェノール, 2-ヒドロキシビフェニル
ko: E231, 오르토페닐 페놀, 2-하이드록시바이페닐
lt: E231, Ortofenilfenolis, 2-hidroksibifenilas
lv: E231, Ortofenilfenols, 2-hidroksibifenils
nl: E231, Fenylfenol, 2-hydroxybifenyl
pl: E231, Ortofenylofenol, 2-hydroksybifenyl
pt: E231, Ortofenilfenol, 2-hidroxibifenil
ro: E231, Ortofenil fenol, 2-hidroxibifenil
ru: E231, Ортофенилфенол, 2-гидроксибифенил
sk: E231, Ortofenylfenol, 2-hydroxybifenyl
sl: E231, Ortofenil fenol, 2-hidroksibifenil
sv: E231, Ortofenylfenol, 2-hydroxibifenyl
th: E231, ออร์โทฟีนิล ฟีนอล, 2-ไฮดรอกซีไบฟีนิล
tr: E231, Ortofenil fenol, 2-hidroksibifenil
uk: E231, Ортофенілфенол, 2-гідроксибіфеніл
zh: E231, 邻苯基苯酚, 2-羟基联苯

en: E232, Sodium orthophenyl phenol
xx: E232
ar: E232, أورثو فينيل فينول الصوديوم
bg: E232, Натриев ортофенил фенол
ca: E232, Ortofenilfenolat de sodi
cs: E232, Orthofenylfenolát sodný
da: E232, Natriumorthophenylphenol
de: E232, Natriumorthophenylphenol
el: E232, Ορθοφαινυλοφαινόλη νατρίου
es: E232, Ortofenilfenato sódico, Orto-fenilfenato sódico, Ortofenilfenato de sodio, Orto-fenilfenato de sodio, Sodio difenil-2-ilo, Orto-fenilfenol imazalil
et: E232, Naatriumortofenüülfenool
fi: E232, Natriumortofenyylifenoli, Natriumortofenyylifenolia
fr: E232, Orthophénylphénate de sodium, Sodium diphényl 2 yl
hu: E232, Nátrium-ortofenil-fenol
it: E232, Ortofenilfenolo di sodio
ja: E232, オルトフェニルフェノールナトリウム
ko: E232, 오르토페닐페놀 나트륨
lt: E232, Natrio ortofenilfenolis
lv: E232, Nātrija ortofenilfenols
nl: E232, Natriumfenylfenol
pl: E232, Ortofenylofenolan sodu
pt: E232, Ortofenilfenol de sódio
ro: E232, Ortofenilfenolat de sodiu
ru: E232, Ортофенилфенолят натрия
sk: E232, Sodná soľ ortofenylfenolu
sl: E232, Natrijev ortofenilfenol
sv: E232, Natriumortofenylfenol
zh: E232, 邻苯基苯酚钠

en: E233, Thiabendazole
xx: E233
bg: E233, Thiabendazole, 4-thiazolyl, benzimidazole
cs: E233, Thiabendazol, 4-thiazolyl, benzimidazol
da: E233, Thiabendazol, 4-thiazolyl, benzimidazol
de: E233, Thiabendazol, 4-thiazolyl, benzimidazol
el: E233, Thiabendazole, 4-thiazolyl, benzimidazole
es: E233, Tiabendazol, 4-tiazolil, benzimidazol
et: E233, Thiabendazole, 4-thiazolyl, benzimidazole
fi: E233, Tiabendatsoli, Tiabendatsolia, 4-tiazolyyli, bentsimidatsoli
fr: E233, Thiabendazole, 4-thiazolyl, benzimidazole
hu: E233, Tiabendazol, 4-tiazolil, benzimidazol
it: E233, Thiabendazolo, 4-tiazolil, benzimidazolo
lt: E233, Thiabendazolas, 4-tiazolilis, benzimidazolas
lv: E233, Thiabendazols, 4-tiazolils, benzimidazols
mt: E233, Thiabendazole, 4-thiazolyl, benzimidazole
nl: E233, Thiabendazool, 4-thiazolyl, benzimidazool
pl: E233, Tiabendazol, 4-tiazolil, benzimidazol
pt: E233, Tiabendazol, 4-tiazolil, benzimidazol
ro: E233, Thiabendazol, 4-tiazolil, benzimidazol
sk: E233, Thiabendazol, 4-thiazolyl, benzimidazol
sl: E233, Thiabendazol, 4-tiazolil, benzimidazol
sv: E233, Thiabendazol, 4-tiazolil, benzimidazol

en: E234, Nisin
xx: E234
ar: E234, نيسين
az: E234, Nisin
bg: E234, Низин
ca: E234, Nisina
cs: E234, Nisin, E 234
da: E234, Nisin
de: E234, Nisin, E 234
el: E234, Νισίνη
eo: E234, Nizino
es: E234, Nisina, E 234
et: E234, Nisiin
fa: E234, نایسین
fi: E234, Nisiini, Nisiiniä
fr: E234, Nisine, C143H230N42O37S7, 1414-45-5
he: E234, ניסין
hr: E234, nizin
hu: E234, Nizin
id: E234, Nisin
it: E234, Nisina
ja: E234, ナイシン
ko: E234, 니신
lt: E234, Nisin
lv: E234, Nisin
mk: E234, Нисин
ms: E234, Nisin
mt: E234, Nisin
nl: E234, Nisine
nn: E234, Nisin
no: E234, Nisin
pl: E234, Nizyna
pt: E234, Nisina
ro: E234, Nisină
ru: E234, Низин
sk: E234, Nisin
sl: E234, Nisin
sq: E234, Nisin
sr: E234, Низин
sv: E234, Nisin, E 234
th: E234, ไนซิน
tr: E234, Nisin
uk: E234, Нізин
vi: E234, Nisin
zh: E234, 乳链菌肽

en: E235, Natamycin, Pimaracin
xx: E235
ar: E235, ناتاميسين
bg: E235, Натамицин
ca: E235, Natamicina
cs: E235, Natamycin
cy: E235, natamycin
da: E235, natamycin
de: E235, Natamycin
el: E235, ναταμυκίνη
es: E235, Natamicina, Pimaricina
fa: E235, ناتامایسین
fi: E235, Natamysiini, Natamysiiniä
fr: E235, Natamycine, pimaricine
gl: E235, Natamicina
hr: E235, natamicin
hu: E235, Natamicin
it: E235, Natamicina
ja: E235, ナタマイシン
lt: E235, natamicinas
lv: E235, natamicīns
nl: E235, Pimaricine, Natamycine
nn: E235, natamycin
or: E235, ନାଟାମାଇସିନ
pl: E235, Natamycyna
pt: E235, Natamicina
ro: E235, natamicină
ru: E235, натамицин
sh: E235, Natamicin
sk: E235, natamycín
sr: E235, натамицин
sv: E235, Natamycin
uk: E235, Натаміцин
vi: E235, Natamycin

en: E236, Formic acid, methanoic acid
xx: E236
bg: E236, Мравчена киселина, Метанова киселина
ca: E236, Àcid fòrmic, acid formic
cs: E236, Kyselina mravenčí, Metanová kyselina, E 236, Kyselina methanová, Formiát, Kyselina metanová, Methanová kyselina
da: E236, Myresyre
de: E236, Ameisensäure, Formiate, E 236, Formiat, Formalinsäure, HCOOH, Formic acid, Acidum formicum, Formylsäure, Hydrocarbonsäure, Methanoate, Methanoat, CH2O2, Methansäure
el: E236, Μεθανικό οξύ, Μυρμηγκικό οξύ, Φορμικό οξύ, Μυρμηκικό οξύ, HCOOH
es: E236, Ácido fórmico, Conservante E236, E 236, Conservante E-236, Acido metanoico, Metanoico
et: E236, Metaanhape, Sipelghape
fi: E236, Muurahaishappo, Metaanihappo, HCOOH, Muurahaishappoa, Metaanihappoa
fr: E236, Acide formique, Acide méthanoïque, Acide hydrogène carboxylique, EPA Pesticide Chemical Code 214900, CAS 64-18-6, Méthanoïque, Formate, HCOOH, 64-18-6, Acide fourmique
hu: E236, Hangyasav
it: E236, Acido formico, CH2O2, Acido metanoico, HCOOH
lv: E236, Skudrskābe, Hcooh, Ch2o2, Metānskābe, Formiāti, Skudruskābe
nl: E236, Mierenzuur, 64-18-6, Formiaatzuur, Methaanzuur, Mierezuur, HCOOH
pl: E236, Kwas mrówkowy, Kwas metanowy, Kwas wodorokarboksylowy, HCOOH
pt: E236, Ácido metanoico, Ácido fórmico
ro: E236, Acid formic
sk: E236, Kyselina mravčia, Kyselina metánová
sl: E236, Mravljinčna kislina, Metanojska kislina, Mravljična kislina, HCOOH
sv: E236, Myrsyra, Metansyra

en: E237, Sodium formiate, Sodium formate
xx: E237
ar: E237, فورمات الصوديوم
az: E237, Natrium format
bg: E237, Натриев формиат
ca: E237, Formiat de sodi
cs: E237, Mravenčan sodný, Metanoát sodný, Sodná sůl kyseliny mravenčí, Sodná sůl kyseliny metanové, Sodná sůl kyseliny methanové, HCOONa, Methanoát sodný
da: E237, Natriumformiat
de: E237, Natriumformiat, Natriummethanat, HCO2Na, E 237
el: E237, Φορμικό νάτριο
eo: E237, Natria formiato
es: E237, Formiato de sodio, E 237, Metanoato de sodio, Formiato sódico
et: E237, Naatriumformiaat
fa: E237, سدیم فرمت
fi: E237, Natriumformiaatti, Natriumformiaattia
fr: E237, Formiate de sodium, Formate de sodium, Sel de l'acide formique, ester de l'acide formique
he: E237, פורמט נתרן
hr: E237, Natrijev format
hu: E237, Nátrium-formiát
id: E237, Natrium format
it: E237, Formiato di sodio, HCOONa
ja: E237, ギ酸ナトリウム
ko: E237, 포름산 나트륨
lt: E237, Natrio formiatas
lv: E237, Nātrija formiāts
mk: E237, Натриум формиат
mt: E237, Formjat tas-sodju
nl: E237, Natriumformiaat
pl: E237, Mrówczan sodu, HCOONa
pt: E237, Formato de sódio, Formiato de sódio, Metanoato de sódio
ro: E237, Formiat de sodiu
ru: E237, Формиат натрия
sk: E237, Mravčan sodný
sl: E237, Natrijev formiat
sq: E237, Format natriumi
sr: E237, Натријум формат
sv: E237, Natriumformiat
th: E237, โซเดียมฟอร์เมต
tr: E237, Sodyum format
uk: E237, Форміат натрію
vi: E237, Natri format
zh: E237, 甲酸钠

en: E238, Calcium formiate, calcium formate
xx: E238
af: E238, Kalsiumformiaat, kalsiumformate
ar: E238, فورمات الكالسيوم, فورمات الكالسيوم
az: E238, Kalsium format, kalsium formate
bg: E238, Формиат на калций, Формат на калций
ca: E238, Formiat de calci, Format de calci
cs: E238, Vápenatý formiát, Vápenatý formát
da: E238, Calciumformiat, Calciumformate
de: E238, Calciumformiat, Calciumformiat
el: E238, Φορμικό ασβέστιο, Φορμικό ασβέστιο
es: E238, Formiato de calcio, Formato de calcio
et: E238, Kaltsiumformiaat, Kaltsiumformaat
fi: E238, Kalsiumformiaatti, Kalsiumformiaattia, Kalsiumformiaatti
fr: E238, Formiate de calcium, Formate de calcium
he: E238, סידן פורמט, סידן פורמט
hi: E238, कैल्शियम फॉर्मेट, कैल्शियम फॉर्मेट
hu: E238, Kalcium-formiát, Kalcium-formát
id: E238, Kalsium format, Kalsium formate
it: E238, Formiato di calcio, Formato di calcio
ja: E238, ギ酸カルシウム, ギ酸カルシウム
ko: E238, 칼슘 포르메이트, 칼슘 포르메이트
lt: E238, Kalcio formiatas, Kalcio formiatas
lv: E238, Kalcija formiāts, Kalcija formiāts
mt: E238, Formjat tal-kalċju, Format tal-kalċju
nl: E238, Calciumformiaat, Calciumformiaat
pl: E238, Mrówczan wapnia, Mrówczan wapniowy
pt: E238, Formiato de cálcio, Formato de cálcio
ro: E238, Formiat de calciu, Formiat de calciu
ru: E238, Формиат кальция, Формат кальция
sk: E238, Vápenatý formiát, Vápenatý formát
sl: E238, Kalcijev formiat, Kalcijev format
sv: E238, Kalciumformiat, Kalciumformiat
th: E238, แคลเซียมฟอร์เมต, แคลเซียมฟอร์เมต
tr: E238, Kalsiyum format, Kalsiyum formate
uk: E238, Форміат кальцію, Формат кальцію
zh: E238, 甲酸钙, 甲酸钙

en: E239, Hexamethylene tetramine, Hexamine, hexamethylenetetramine
xx: E239
bg: E239, Хексаметилен тетрамин, Хексамин, Уротропин, Сух спирт, Хексаметилентетрамин
ca: E239, Hexametilentetramina
cs: E239, Hexamethylentetramin, Hexamin, Urotropin, Pevný podpalovač, Tuhý podpalovač, PePo, HMTA, Tuhý líh, Pevný líh
da: E239, Hexamethylentetramin, Hexamin, Methamin, Urotropin
de: E239, Hexamethylentetramin, Hexamin, Urotropin, Trockenspiritus, E 239, Methamin, Methenamin, Formin, Hexamethylentetraamin
el: E239, Εξαμεθυλενοτετραμινη, Εξαμίνη
es: E239, Hexametilentetramina, Hexamina, Urotropina, Metenamina, E 239
et: E239, Heksametüleentetramiin, Heksamiin, Urotropiin
fi: E239, Heksametyleenitetramiini, Heksamiini, Urotropiini, Metenamiini, HMTA, Heksametyleenitetramiiniä, Heksamiiniä, Urotropiiniä, Metenamiiniä
fr: E239, Hexaméthylènetétramine, Hexamine, méthénamine, C6H12N4, Urotropine, E 239, 100-97-0
hu: E239, Hexametilén-tetramin, Hexamin
it: E239, Esametilentetramina, Esamina, esametilentetrammina, urotropina, esammina, metenamina
lt: E239, Heksametileno tetraaminas, Heksaminas, C6H12N4, Heksametiltetraminas, Urotropinas
lv: E239, Heksametilēntetramīns, Heksamīns, Urotropīns, C6h12n4, Metēnamīns, (ch2)6n4
mt: E239, Eżametilen tetrammina, Eżammina
nl: E239, Hexamethyleentetramine, Hexamine
pl: E239, Heksametylenoczteroamina, Heksamina, Urotropina, Metenamina, Heksametylenotetraamina, HMTA
pt: E239, Hexametilenotetramina, Hexamina, urotropina, metenamina
ro: E239, Hexametilentetramină, Hexamină
sk: E239, Hexametylén tetramín, Hexamín
sl: E239, Heksametilen-tetramin, heksamin
sv: E239, Hexametylentetramin, Hexamin, Urotropin, HMTA, E 239, Hexametylentetraamin

en: E240, Formaldehyde, methanal
xx: E240
bg: E240, Формалдехид, Метанал
cs: E240, Formaldehyd, Metanal, Aldehyd kyseliny methanové, Aldehyd kyseliny metanové, Methanal, CH2O, E 240, Aldehyd kyseliny mravenčí
da: E240, Formaldehyd, Formalin
de: E240, Formaldehyd, Formalin, Methanal, Methylaldehyd, Formol, HCHO, CH2O
el: E240, Μεθανάλη, Φορμαλδεΰδη, CH2O
es: E240, Formaldehído, Formaldeido, Formol, Metanal, CH2O, H2CO
et: E240, Metanaal, Formaldehüüd
fi: E240, Formaldehydi, Formoli, Metanaali, Metyylialdehydi, Metyleenioksidi, Formaldehydiä, Formolia, Metanaalia, Metyylialdehydiä, Metyleenioksidia
fr: E240, Formaldéhyde, Formaldéhyde Conservateur, Aldéhyde formique, Formol, Méthanal, Formaline, HCHO, 50-00-0
hu: E240, Formaldehid, metanal
it: E240, Formaldeide, Aldeide formica, Ossimetilene, Metilaldeide, Ossido di metilene, Metanale, CH2O, Formalina
lt: E240, Formaldehidas, Metileno oksidas, Metanalis, Formolas, Formalinas, H2CO
lv: E240, Formaldehīds, Hcoh, Ch2o, Formalīns, Metanāls
nl: E240, Formaldehyde, Formaline, Methanal, Formaldehyd, Formol, 50-00-0
pl: E240, Aldehyd mrówkowy, Formaldehyd, Metanal
pt: E240, metanal, óxido de metileno, formol, formaldeído, formalina
ro: E240, Formaldehidă, Aldehidă formică, Formol, Metanal
ru: E240, Формальдегид, HCHO, Е240, Formaldehyde, CH2O, CHOH, HCOH, формидрон, метаналь, муравьиный альдегид
sk: E240, Formaldehyd
sl: E240, Formaldehid, Pentaerititol
sv: E240, Formaldehyd, Formalaldehyd, Metanal, Formox

en: E241, Gum Guaicum
xx: E241
bg: E241, Гума Гуайакум
cs: E241, Guma Guaicum
da: E241, Gummi Guaicum
de: E241, Guaicum Gummi
el: E241, Κόμμι Γκουαϊακούμης
es: E241, Goma Guaicum
et: E241, Guaicum Kumm
fi: E241, Guajakki-kumi, guajakki-kumia
fr: E241, Gomme gaïac
hu: E241, Guajakgumi
it: E241, Gomma Guaicum
lt: E241, Guma Guaicum
lv: E241, Guma Guaicum
mt: E241, Gomma Guaicum
nl: E241, Gom Guaicum
pl: E241, Guma Guaicum
pt: E241, Goma Guaicum
ro: E241, Gumă Guaicum
sk: E241, Guma Guaicum
sl: E241, Guma Guaicum
sv: E241, Guaicum Gummi

en: E242, Dimethyl dicarbonate, DMDC, methoxycarbonyl methyl carbonate, dicarbonic acid dimethyl ester, Velcorin
xx: E242
ar: E242, ثنائي ميثيل ثنائي الكربونات
bg: E242, Диметил дикарбонат, DMDC
ca: E242, Dicarbonat de dimetil, DMDC
cs: E242, Dimethyldiuhličitan, DMDC
da: E242, dimethyldikarbonat, dimethyldicarbonat, DMDC
de: E242, Dimethyldicarbonat, DMDC, Velcorin
el: E242, Δικαρβονικος διμεθυλεστερας, DMDC
es: E242, Dimetil dicarbonato, DMDC, Dicarbonato de dimetilo
et: E242, Dimetüüldikarbonaat, DMDC
fa: E242, دی‌متیل دی‌کربنات
fi: E242, Dimetyylidikarbonaatti, DMDC, Dimetyylidikarbonaattia
fr: E242, Dicarbonate de diméthyle, DMDC, Velcorin, Acide dicarbonique diméthyle ester, Diméthyle pyrocarbonate, Méthoxycarbonyle méthyle carbonate
hr: E242, dimetil dikarbonat
hu: E242, Dimetil-dikarbonát, DMDC
it: E242, Dimetildicarbonato, DMDC
ja: E242, 二炭酸ジメチル
lt: E242, Dimetilo dikarbonatas, DMDC
lv: E242, Dimetildikarbonāts, DMDC
mt: E242, Dimetil dikarbonat, DMDC
nl: E242, Dimethyldicarbonaat, DMDC
pl: E242, Dimetylodiwęglan, DMDC, Pirowęglan dimetylu
pt: E242, Dicarbonato de dimetilo, DMDC, Dicarbonato de dimetila
ro: E242, Dicarbonat de dimetil, DMDC
sh: E242, Dimetil dikarbonat
sk: E242, Dimetyl-dikarbonát, DMDC
sl: E242, Dimetildikarbonat, DMDC
sr: E242, Dimetil dikarbonat
sv: E242, Dimetyldikarbonat, DMDC

en: E243, Ethyl lauroyl arginate
xx: E243
ar: E243, إيثيل لورويل أرجينات
az: E243, Etil lauroil arginat
bg: E243, Етил лауроил аргинат
ca: E243, Etil lauroil arginat
cs: E243, Ethyl lauroyl arginát
da: E243, Ethyllauroylarginat
de: E243, Ethyllauroylarginat
el: E243, Αιθυλική λαουροϋλ αργινίνη
es: E243, Etil lauroil arginato
fi: E243, Etyylilauryyliarginaatti, Etyylilauryyliarginaattia
fr: E243, Arginate d’éthyle laurique
hr: E243, Etil lauroil arginat
hu: E243, Etil-lauroil-arginát
it: E243, Etil lauroil arginato
ja: E243, エチルラウロイルアルギネート
ko: E243, 에틸 라우로일 아르기네이트
lt: E243, Etil lauroil arginatas
lv: E243, Etil lauroil argināts
nl: E243, Ethyllauroylarginaat
pl: E243, Etylu lauroilu arginian
pt: E243, Etil lauroil arginato
ro: E243, Etil lauroil arginat
ru: E243, Этил лауроил аргинат
sk: E243, Etyl lauroyl arginát
sl: E243, Etil lauroil arginat
sv: E243, Etyllauroylarginat
tr: E243, Etil lauroil arginat
zh: E243, 乙基月桂酰精氨酸酯

en: E246, Glycolipids
xx: E246
ar: E246, غليكوليبيد
az: E246, Qlikolipidlər
bg: E246, Гликолипиди
ca: E246, Glicolípids
cs: E246, Glykolipidy
da: E246, Glykolipider
de: E246, Glykolipide
el: E246, Γλυκολιπίδια
es: E246, Glicolípidos
et: E246, Glükolipiidid
fi: E246, Glykolipidit
fr: E246, Glycolipides
hu: E246, Glikolipidek
id: E246, Glikolipid
it: E246, Glicolipidi
ja: E246, 糖脂質
ko: E246, 당지질
lt: E246, Glikolipidai
lv: E246, Glikolipīdi
mt: E246, Glikolipidi
nl: E246, Glycolipiden
pl: E246, Glikolipidy
pt: E246, Glicolipídios
ro: E246, Glicolipide
ru: E246, Гликолипиды
sk: E246, Glykolipidy
sl: E246, Glikolipidi
sv: E246, Glykolipider
th: E246, ไกลโคลิปิด
tr: E246, Glikolipitler
uk: E246, Гліколіпіди
zh: E246, 糖脂

en: E249, Potassium nitrite
xx: E249
bg: E249, Калиев нитрит
ca: E249, Nitrit de potassi
cs: E249, Dusitan draselný, KNO2, E 249
da: E249, Kaliumnitrit
de: E249, Kaliumnitrit, E 249, Salpetrigsaures Kalium, KNO2
el: E249, Νιτρωδες καλιο
es: E249, Nitrito potásico, Nitrito de potasio, E 249
et: E249, Kaaliumnitrit
fi: E249, Kaliumnitriitti, KNO2, Kaliumnitriittiä
fr: E249, Nitrite de potassium, KNO2
hu: E249, Kálium-nitrit
it: E249, Nitrito di potassio, KNO2
lt: E249, Kalio nitritas
lv: E249, Kālija nitrīts
mt: E249, Nitrit tal-potassju
nl: E249, Kaliumnitriet
pl: E249, Azotyn potasu, Azotan(III) potasu
pt: E249, Nitrito de potássio
ro: E249, Nitrit de potasiu
sk: E249, Dusitan draselný
sl: E249, Kalijev nitrit
sv: E249, Kaliumnitrit